Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-35] Bond financing. The
director of finance may issue general obligation bonds and short-term project
notes of the State in an aggregate amount not to exceed $105,000,000 for the
dwelling unit revolving fund created by section 201H-191. Pending the receipt
of funds from the issuance and sale of the bonds and notes, the amount required
for the purposes of this chapter shall be advanced from the general fund of the
State. Upon the receipt of the bond or note funds, the general fund shall be
reimbursed. The director of finance may sequester and separate the proceeds
from the sale of the bonds and notes into separate funds and the amounts in
either fund may be used for any of the purposes set forth in this chapter. [L
2006, c 180, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next